Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0508.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1. As used in this act:
(a) "Educational institution" means that term as defined in
section 2 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.2.
(b) "Federal immigration officer" means an officer, employee,
or individual paid by or acting as an agent of the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement or United States Customs and
Border Protection, or any division thereof, or any other officer,
employee, or individual paid by or acting as an agent of the United
States Department of Homeland Security.
LEP S01762'25 (S-3) i3gqv4


(c) "Immigration enforcement action" means any of the
following actions taken by a federal immigration officer for the
purpose of immigration enforcement or to obtain information in
regards to an individual's immigration or citizenship status:
(i) Arresting or interviewing an individual.
(ii) Conducting a search or surveillance.
(d) "Place of worship" means a church, synagogue, mosque, or
other institution of worship, including, but not limited to, a
building rented for a religious service.
(e) "Protected area" means all of the following:
(i) An educational institution.
(ii) A hospital or other health facility.
(iii) A courthouse.
(iv) The site of an organization that is assisting children,
pregnant women, victims of crime or abuse, or an individual with
significant mental or physical disabilities.
(v) A public library.
(vi) A place of worship.
Sec. 2. A federal immigration officer may not conduct an
immigration enforcement action in a nonpublic area of a protected
area, unless 1 or more of the following apply:
(a) The federal immigration officer presents a valid judicial
warrant.
(b) An exigent circumstance exists.
Final Page
LEP S01762'25 (S-3) i3gqv4